tr_test.dic
üşümek/ї
gümlemek/ї
düzlemek/ї
düdüklemek/ї
çürümek/ї
öğürtlemek/ї
küngürdemek/ї
küçüksemek/ї
sürümek/ї
püflemek/ї
önemek/ї
ünlemek/ї
yürümek/ї
sürüklemek/ї
körüklemek/ї
özemek/ї
üstünsemek/ї
düzemek/ї
önlemek/ї
özümlemek/ї
gözlemek/ї
gülümsemek/ї
özütlemek/ї
gümrüklemek/ї
küllemek/ї
gümüşlemek/ї
nötrlemek/ї
büyümek/ї
köklemek/ї
üflemek/ї
sölpümek/ї
büzgülemek/ї
közlemek/ї
tüplemek/ї
ödemek/ї
güdülemek/ї
bürümek/ї
büyülemek/ї
yülümek/ї
dürtüklemek/ї
ölçümlemek/ї
küçümsemek/ї
büğemek/ї
şakullemek/ї
üstüpülemek/ї
kötümsemek/ї
kürnemek/ї
örklemek/ї
sülfürlemek/ї
çözümlemek/ї
indüklemek/ї
gürlemek/ї
türemek/ї
tütsülemek/ї
öksemek/ї
güdümlemek/ї
eşgüdümlemek/ї
küremek/ї
sönümlemek/ї
kösnümek/ї
süslemek/ї
kütlemek/ї
yüzlemek/ї
löklemek/ї
züğürtlemek/ї
öremek/ї
üçlemek/ї
pörtlemek/ї
göynümek/ї
kütürdemek/ї
düşlemek/ї
öğütlemek/ї
göğüslemek/ї
güzlemek/ї
kürümek/ї
döllemek/ї
üremek/ї
öykülemek/ї
siyanürlemek/ї
büyümsemek/ї
gürüldemek/ї
gümbürdemek/ї
dörtlemek/ї
sansürlemek/ї
südremek/ї
bütünlemek/ї
tünemek/ї
tümlemek/ї
tükürüklemek/ї
dürtüşlemek/ї
ürümek/ї
sümek/ї
söğüşlemek/ї
ütülemek/ї
göllemek/ї
bölümlemek/ї
söylemek/ї
gücümsemek/ї
pörsümek/ї
örgütlemek/ї
dürümlemek/ї
dökümlemek/ї
görüntülemek/ї
ölçünlemek/ї
günlemek/ї
kükürtlemek/ї
çözgülemek/ї
süngülemek/ї
türkülemek/ї
özümsemek/ї
kükremek/ї
düğümlemek/ї
büyüksemek/ї
mühürlemek/ї
özgülemek/ї
yüklemek/ї
bitümlemek/ї
günülemek/ї
gömülemek/ї
küçüklemek/ї
köhnemek/ї
törpülemek/ї
gözemek/ї
hüngürdemek/ї
döşemek/ї
özlemek/ї
ödünlemek/ї
sürgülemek/ї
köpülemek/ї
göğnümek/ї
böldürme/ї
böldürtme/ї
böldürülme/ї
bölünme/ї
bölüşme/ї
bölüştürme/ї
bölüştürülme/ї
börtme/ї
börttürme/ї
börtülme/ї
böğürme/ї
böğürtme/ї
bükme/ї
büktürme/ї
büktürülme/ї
bükülme/ї
bükünme/ї
bürüme/ї
büründürme/ї
bürünme/ї
büyültme/ї
büyütme/ї
büyüttürme/ї
büyütülme/ї
büzdürme/ї
büzdürülme/ї
büzme/ї
büzülme/ї
büzüşme/ї
büzüştürme/ї
büzüştürülme/ї
döktürme/ї
döktürtme/ї
dökülme/ї
dökünme/ї
döndürme/ї
döndürtme/ї
döndürülme/ї
dönülme/ї
dönüşme/ї
dönüştürme/ї
dönüştürülme/ї
dövdürme/ї
dövdürtme/ї
dövdürtülme/ї
dövdürülme/ї
dövülme/ї
dövünme/ї
dövüşme/ї
dövüştürme/ї
dürtme/ї
dürtülme/ї
dürtüşme/ї
dürtüştürme/ї
dürülme/ї
düzdürme/ї
düzülme/ї
düzüşme/ї
düşme/ї
düşündürme/ї
düşündürtme/ї
düşünme/ї
düşünülme/ї
düşürme/ї
düşürtme/ї
düşürttürme/ї
düşürülme/ї
ergürme/ї
gölle/ї
gömülme/ї
gördürme/ї
gördürtme/ї
görme/ї
görülme/ї
görünme/ї
görüştürme/ї
görüştürülme/ї
görüşülme/ї
götürme/ї
götürtme/ї
götürülme/ї
göyme/ї
göynüme/ї
göyünme/ї
gözükme/ї
göçme/ї
göçülme/ї
göçürme/ї
göçürtme/ї
göçürülme/ї
güdülme/ї
güldürme/ї
güldürtme/ї
gülme/ї
gülünme/ї
gülüşme/ї
gülüşülme/ї
gütme/ї
güçsünme/ї
höykürme/ї
köpürme/ї
köpürtme/ї
küsme/ї
küstürme/ї
küsüşme/ї
küçülme/ї
küçültme/ї
küçülttürme/ї
pörsüme/ї
pörsütme/ї
püfkürme/ї
püskürme/ї
püskürtme/ї
püskürtülme/ї
sökme/ї
söktürme/ї
söktürtme/ї
söktürtülme/ї
söktürülme/ї
sökülme/ї
sölpüme/ї
sömürme/ї
sömürtme/ї
sömürülme/ї
söndürme/ї
söndürtme/ї
söndürtülme/ї
söndürülme/ї
sönme/ї
sövdürme/ї
sövdürtme/ї
sövdürtülme/ї
sövdürülme/ї
sövme/ї
sövülme/ї
sövüşme/ї
sövüştürme/ї
sümkürme/ї
sümkürtme/ї
sümkürtülme/ї
sümkürülme/ї
sündürme/ї
sündürtme/ї
sündürtülme/ї
sündürülme/ї
sünme/ї
süpürme/ї
süpürtme/ї
süpürtülme/ї
süpürülme/ї
sürdürme/ї
sürdürtme/ї
sürdürtülme/ї
sürdürülme/ї
sürtme/ї
sürttürme/ї
sürtülme/ї
sürtünme/ї
sürtüşme/ї
sürtüştürme/ї
sürtüştürtülme/ї
sürtüşülme/ї
sürçme/ї
sürçtürme/ї
sürçtürtülme/ї
sürçülme/ї
süründürme/ї
süründürtülme/ї
sürünme/ї
sürüştürme/ї
süzdürme/ї
süzme/ї
töskürme/ї
tükürme/ї
tünme/ї
tüttürme/ї
tüydürme/ї
tüyme/ї
yüksünme/ї
yükündürme/ї
yülüme/ї
yüpürme/ї
yürüme/ї
yürütme/ї
yürütülme/ї
yüzdürülme/ї
yüzülme/ї
çöktürme/ї
çöktürülme/ї
çömme/ї
çözdürülme/ї
çözülme/ї
çözündürülme/ї
çözüşme/ї
çöğdürme/ї
çöğünme/ї
çürütme/ї
öksürme/ї
öldürme/ї
öldürülme/ї
ölçme/ї
ölçülme/ї
ölçüştürme/ї
öngörme/ї
öpme/ї
öptürtme/ї
öpüşme/ї
ördürme/ї
örtme/ї
örtülme/ї
örtüşme/ї
örülme/ї
öttürme/ї
ötüşme/ї
övme/ї
övünce/ї
öykünme/ї
öğürtme/ї
öğütülme/ї
ürkme/ї
ürkütülme/ї
ürüşme/ї
ütülme/ї
üşme/ї
üşürme/ї
üşüşme/ї
